Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-3418
Organization, defined.

Organization means a business entity created by law, including, but not limited to, a partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or joint venture.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 18;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 17.